tests/verb-classes.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[lexc] Verbs ending in a vowel":
    ara<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : ararım
    başla<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : başlarım
    bekle<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : beklerim
    de<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : derim
    hazırla<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : hazırlarım
    oyna<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : oynarım

 "[lexc] Polysyllabic verbs stems":
    kullan<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : kullanırım
    beğen<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : beğenirim
    ayrıl<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : ayrılırım
    bit<v><iv><caus><aor><p1><sg> : bitiririm
    otur<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : otururum
    götür<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : götürürüm

 "[lexc] Monosyllabic verb stems with A":
    aç<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : açarım
    çık<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : çıkarım
    dön<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : dönerim
    düş<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : düşerim
    et<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : ederim
    git<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : giderim
    gir<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : girerim

 "[lexc] Monosyllabic verb stems with I (closed class)":
    al<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : alırım
    bil<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : bilirim
    bul<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : bulurum
    dur<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : dururum
    gel<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : gelirim
    gör<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : görürüm
    kal<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : kalırım
    ol<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : olurum
    öl<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : ölürüm
    san<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : sanırım
    var<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : varırım
    ver<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : veririm
    vur<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : vururum
